Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1644SV (1) 91 jm/jh S.F. 379 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. Subtract, to the extent included, 3 the payment of expenses for the following: 4 (1) For instruction at an institution of higher education 5 for career-related programs that do not qualify for college 6 credit. 7 (2) For participation in an apprenticeship program. 8 b. Payments made from the Iowa education savings plan 9 established in chapter 12D or from a similar plan do not 10 qualify for the deduction under this subsection. 11 c. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 12 to implement this subsection. 13 d. As used in this subsection: 14 (1) âApprenticeship programâ means a program registered with 15 the Iowa office of apprenticeship under chapter 84D. 16 (2) âExpensesâ means tuition, fees, books, supplies, and 17 equipment. 18 (3) âInstitution of higher educationâ means any of the 19 following: 20 (a) A community college established under chapter 260C. 21 (b) An institution governed by the state board of regents. 22 (c) An accredited private institution as defined in section 23 256.183, subsection 1. 24 (4) âPaymentâ includes loan repayments for expenses paid 25 for instruction at an institution of higher education and for 26 payments of expenses for instruction at an institution of 27 higher education and for the participation in an apprenticeship 28 program. 29 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 30 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 31 or after that date. 32